Title
Review for Jurassic Park (1993)
Number of Reviews
19

Author
Eric Walker
     My ears are still ringing and my head is still swimming from the
experience I had last night: I saw Steven Spielberg's JURASSIC PARK.
The movie of the year, the ads call it, with dinosaurs so life-like you
won't believe they're real.  There hasn't been this much hype for a
movie since 1989's BATMAN, and expectations have been high that we
would finally see a return to the old Spielberg magic that's been
missing since the days of RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK and E.T.  The
question to ask, therefore, is "does the movie live up to the hype?"
     Yes, it does.  The movie isn't perfect, but it delivers what the
audience wants to see, and more.  You want dinosaurs?  There has never
been anything on the screen quite like the dinosaurs we see in JURASSIC
PARK.  The movie is teeming with them, and they're every bit as scary
as we want to be, and then some.  The dinosaurs take us on a thrilling,
terrifying roller-coaster ride from the first frame to the last.  I
haven't felt this wrung-out by a movie since I saw ALIENS in 1986;
there's an intensity to this film that grabs us and holds us on the
edge of our seats, carrying over any weaknesses in plot and
characterization.  In fact, the dinosaurs outshine the human cast,
typifying a weakness inherent in all of Spielberg's movies.
     I could go on and on about those dinosaurs.  This movie has the
special effects Oscar in the bag, especially where the Tyrannosaurus
Rex is concerned.  The only time it seems as though we're looking at
animatronics and not at live lizards is when the dinosaurs aren't
moving (which isn't often).  The brachiosaurs tower over the tops of
hundred-foot-tall trees, and the fearsome velociraptors (which like to
hunt in packs) look like the came from our darkest nightmares.  You
absolutely will not believe your eyes.
     In fact, the dinosaurs are so realistic that parents with young
children may want to seriously consider the movie's PG-13 rating before
taking their kids to the theatre.  Spielberg knows how to frighten an
audience without blood; in fact, there's less blood and gore in this
movie than there was in JAWS.  There are scares aplenty, though, and
they all come from suspense and the sheer presence of the T-rex as it
thunders across the screen, crushing everything in sight in pursuit of
his meals - both dinosaurs and humans.  His assault on a party of
Jurassic Park sightseers may be the most intensely frightening scene
Spielberg has ever filmed.  It's a far cry from Barney.  The film pulls
out all stops to wring suspense out of the dinosaurs, and at this it
succeeds grandly.
     The human actors and actresses struggle to compete with these
awesome titans, but let's be honest: Spielberg could have cast anyone
in these roles and gotten the same results.  After the troubles with
HOOK, in which casting problems and demands (as well as outrageous
salaries) struck a heavy blow to its success, Spielberg has apparently
gone back to using actors and actresses less in demand, thus
guaranteeing that he would have the final say in every stage of
production.  (Laura Dern has commented that when it comes to control of
his movies, Spielberg is more obsessive than David Lynch.)  This means
the dinosaurs take the center stage, and no attempt is made to outshine
them.
    The story is essentially an update of the classic monster movies
of the 1950s, those films that state that There Are Things Man Was Not
Meant To Know.  In the case of this movie, it's the power of creation,
as Man (specifically, a billionaire named John Hammond, played by
Richard Attenborough) has taken dinosaur DNA from the blood of
mosquitoes encased in amber for millions of years and used it to grow
brand-new, living reptiles.  Hammond wants to put these dinosaurs in
a theme park on an island off the coast of Costa Rica and display them
for the world to see, but he finds that living beings can't be
controlled as easily as the robotic creations of Disneyland.
     That tells us all we need to know about the story.  In terms of
thrills and excitement, it lives up to its expectations and more - but
there are serious flaws in terms of characterization and plot
development.  The humans are there simply to be gobbled up and to run
away from dinosaurs.  Most of the people seeing this movie aren't even
going to remember their names by the time the final credits roll;
there's no Chief Brody or Lacombe or Elliot here.  Sam Neill and Laura
Dern put in passable performances as the pair of archaeologists who
squabble about whether or not to raise a family.  He doesn't want kids,
and she does - but of course there's a heart of gold underneath his
supposedly gruff exterior, and when the chips are down he plays the
father figure, risking his life to protect the kids tagging along with
them.
     Richard Attenborough is John Hammond, the billionaire who's
brought back the dinosaurs, cloning them from dinosaur DNA taken from
fossilized mosquitoes.  Unlike his obsessed opportunist character in
the novel, he's a kindly grandfather figure who wants nothing more
than to impress the world with his creation, making his dinosaurs
available for all to see.  This is why he built Jurassic Park - he's a
modern-day Walt Disney, more interested in the care and enjoyment of
his guests than he is with making money.
     Then there's Malcolm, a modern-day update of the scientist
warning against tampering with nature.  He quotes the Chaos Theory (a
new branch of mathematics that governs probability and predicting the
unpredictable), and of course we know he's right when he says that
"life can't be controlled" - because in this type of movie, it never
is.  Things go wrong, and before anyone knows what's happening
Jurassic Park is out of control and dinosaurs are moving this way and
that, munching on the unfortunate souls who get in their way.
     The cause of these problems can be traced back to human greed as
much as the unpredictability of Nature.  There's an interesting theme
of greed and its consequences here that's especially appropriate when
one sees how much of a theme park the movie itself is.  We've all
heard the JURASSIC PARK hype campaign; the merchandise is flooding the
markets; the books, T-shirts, tie-ins, and other companies jumping in
on the money-making bandwagon here in real life are ironically
parodied in the film, as we have corporate executives discussing how
much they should charge for park admission.  In one scene, John
Hammond realizes that his theme park is not going to get off the
ground, and we see several of the JURASSIC PARK products that are
actually being sold here in real life.  The merchandising campaign for
this film was planned before it ever reached the filming stage, and
Spielberg is trying to satirize it by taking us behind the scenes and
realizing how difficult it actually is to sell a theme park to the
public.  While it fails as satire, it still retains a level of irony.
     (Spielberg may be lamenting the cost of success: because this
movie cost so much to make [as did his last film, HOOK], merchandising
is an important tool for the studio to make its money back.  This
means that the theme park aspect is built right into the movie itself.
Spielberg considered saving the pirate ship from HOOK for use in a
possible theme park, but that idea was abandoned.  In addition, he had
wanted to build life-size robotic dinosaurs for this film so that they
could be used in a theme park afterwards, but that idea didn't pan out
either.  Nevertheless, we all know that a JURASSIC PARK ride is going
to show up at Universal Studios.  The movie is plugging its
merchandise as heavily as the dinosaurs themselves, but Spielberg
found a way to make fun of merchandising at the same time.)
     But the problems in the story make the film less of an
achievement than CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND or JAWS, both of
which are paid homage in this film.  When the characters see dinosaurs
for the first time, Spielberg is trying to get the "sense of wonder"
that he achieved so magnificently in his UFO film, but at he fails at
this.  In CLOSE ENCOUNTERS, our enjoyment came from both the UFOS and
the reactions of the humans to beings from outer space, but that's not
the case here.  The dinosaurs *are* amazing and we gasp in awe when we
see them, but our excitement comes entirely from the special effects
and not from the characters, because they're so poorly developed.
     A subplot involving sick dinosaurs is also worth mentioning.  I
was hoping that this aspect would be further developed, but it seems
little more than a red herring.  This ties into the ending of the
film, which is too abrupt to be truly satisfying.  One extended
sequence of the characters talking about the sick dinosaurs and their
possible life expectancy would have helped; I think that it could have
been a tribute to WAR OF THE WORLDS, and it would have been a more
satisfying conclusion.
     But as serious as these flaws are, they don't subtract from the
excitement we feel when the film kicks into high gear.  It bogs down
in a couple of places during the first hour, but once the machines
begin to fail and the dinosaurs are on the loose, the film turns into
one of the most exciting, terrifying monster movies ever filmed.
Spielberg even tops his own JAWS for excitement here, as we find
ourselves gripping the seats and forgetting to breathe.  My eyes were
locked to the screen for the entire second half of the film, and I was
putty in Spielberg's hands as he delivered one amazing scene after
another.  I especially love the fact that there is almost no blood in
this film.  In an age when even big-budget science fiction movies like
TOTAL RECALL rely on splatter and gore for audience entertainment,
JURASSIC PARK scares its audience without making them sick to their
stomach.
     The Tyrannosaurus Rex is a wonder to behold.  The special effects
belie themselves even in a mega-budget production like this, and if we
look hard enough we can see where the computer animation and mattes
are being used.  That's minor nit-picking, however, and anyone who
complains about the special effects is a spoiled brat who doesn't
believe in "suspension of disbelief."  But the T-rex will shut the
mouths of the most fanatical critics.  It's an awesome creation,
definitely the most realistic movie monster *ever* created.  It does
not look like the product of computers and models - it looks *real*!
You absolutely will not believe your eyes when you see it, and you'll
have an uncontrollable urge to duck when it lunges right at you.  Best
of all, T-rex is a homage to the movie monsters of old: there's one
scene where it eats a helpless victim that reminds me of the classic
THE BEAST FROM 20,000 FATHOMS (and the great Ray Harryhausen).
     This brings up an important question for parents.  Since the film
is such a terrifying monster movie, should young children be allowed
to see it?  The answer, I think, lies with the parents themselves.
I'm not going to make a blanket statement here, because you know your
children better than I do.  There are eight-year-olds in the audience
who will eat this movie up and ask for more, but there are also
children who will consider the movie too frightening to finish.
Personally, I belong to the "give it a try" school: since there's very
little gore in the film and its terror comes from suspense rather than
actual violence, the experience of seeing a scary movie may actually
be a good one for kids.  It's similar to taking a four-year-old to see
PINOCCHIO; he'll be frightened by the experience, but he certainly
won't be traumatized for life, and years from now he'll look back on
the experience and remember it.  In the end, it's up to you.  If you
think JURASSIC PARK is too frightening for kids, don't take them.  If
you do, then let them see it.  The movie is rated PG-13 for good
reason.
     JURASSIC PARK is an unforgettable summer experience, a movie that
delivers exactly what we expect from it.  It's got a flawed story and
forgettable characters, but it also has some of the most amazing
monsters of all time.  The dinosaurs of JURASSIC PARK are a new
high-water mark in the long history of Hollywood movie monsters,
standing tall with King Kong, the Martians of WAR OF THE WORLDS, and
other fondly-remembered creatures of the past.  It's an movie well
worth paying full admission price for, as long as you realize that
you're not going to get Academy Award-winning performances or a complex
plot.  It's a far more satisfying film than the other summer
blockbusters of recent years: TERMINATOR 2, BATMAN, TOTAL RECALL, and
other flawed adventure movies.  I can't see any movie coming out in the
near future that will deliver a more satisfying good time at the
movies.  Arnold Swchwarzenegger?  Who cares?  1993 is going to be
remembered as the year we first heard the thundering footsteps of
JURASSIC PARK.

Author
Jerry Saravia
Steven Spielberg is one of the few directors that can produce real movie 
magic on screen. Consider the magic wand he waved in such classics as 
"Raiders of the Lost Ark", "E.T.", "Jaws" and "Close Encounters of the Third 
Kind." "Jurassic Park" is no exception and though it is no classic by any 
means, it is a thrill-happy, terrifically exciting action picture bringing 
back Spielberg's whiz-bang intensity that the otherwise middling "Always" and 
the overblown "Hook" lacked. 
Based loosely on Michael Crichton's novel, "Jurassic Park" focuses on a group 
of scientists (Sam Neill, Jeff Goldblum and Laura Dern) visiting a 
fantastical park in a South American island populated by live-breathing 
dinosaurs, including a vicious Tyrannosaurus Rex, quick-tempered, meat-eating 
velociraptors, and cuddly Brontosaurus specimens. According to John Hammond 
(Richard Attenborough), the owner of the park, the dinosaurs were genetically 
engineered by dinosaur blood found in mosquitoes, which were preserved in 
amber! Essentially, Hammond is like Frankenstein, bringing back dinosaurs 
from the dead!
"Jurassic Park" is a thrill ride from start to finish. Spielberg and writers 
Michael Crichton and David Koepp are not interested in character development 
- they simply know that audiences are too interested in seeing dinosaurs. You 
have to remember that the year 1993 was a revolutionary year for cinema - the 
term CGI was born. This  meant that creating believable creatures and 
landscapes with the use of computer-generated images was a true possibility. 
Thus, this film was the first to ever show the most realistic dinosaurs ever 
seen in film history and that was the draw for audiences. Today, CGI seems 
like an afterthought but back then, it was an astounding achievement. 
Spielberg uses CGI to his advantage. There are two exceptional Spielberg 
sequences: one is a scary, horrifying sequence in which the T-Rex attacks two 
kids trapped in a car, and the other is when the velociraptors trap the same 
kids in a kitchen. There are lots of dino chomping scenes but then there are 
some purely amazing moments that evoke a sense of wonder and joy. The first 
glimpse of a dinosaur is the brontosaurus as it tries to reach a tree branch 
- Spielberg shoots the scene from a low-angle so that we get the feeling we 
are witnessing a majestic, prehistoric creature too grand and mysterious for 
our eye level. The T-Rex itself is astounding, and the impressive soundtrack 
(recorded in DTS, digital sound, for the first time ever) enhances the 
credibility and realism of these creatures. 
So much talk about the dinos, what about the humans? Well, they recede in the 
background because any movie with creatures, especially dinos, will steal 
scenes from others, no holds barred. Still, this is a helluva good cast. 
Attenborough is appropriately and equally gleeful and stubborn as the 
gullible owner, unaware of what he has created. Sam Neill, an actor I 
dislike, gives a pleasing performance as Dr. Grant who seems to have a 
dislike for children. Laura Dern is wasted as Grant's wife, capable of much 
more than screaming fits. The actor who upstages them all is Jeff Goldblum as 
Ian Malcolm, a chaos theorist and mathematician who wears funny sunglasses 
and a rock n'roll leather jacket - he seems to have stepped out of "American 
Graffiti." His one-liners and his ridicule of this dangerous theme park bring 
a level of irony that Spielberg could have carried further than he does. 
As a story, "Jurassic Park" lacks much thrust or significance, though it can 
be construed as a modern-day Frankenstein tale where the act of creating 
rests solely on whether something should be created, particularly when you 
meddle with nature. The characters are thin but they remain watchable 
personalities (including Samuel L. Jackson in a small role as a computer 
expert and Wayne Knight as another computer expert who decides to steal some 
specimens). But for undeniable thrills and escapist entertainment, nothing 
can beat Spielberg's exciting dinos and kinetic action sequences. As Pauline 
Kael once remarked, Spielberg doesn't just thrill you, he spooks you with 
giddiness and exhilaration. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at 
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Author
Brian L. Johnson
2:10, PG-13, Science Fiction/Action, 1993
Director: Steven Spielberg
Cast: Sam Neill, Laura Dern, Richard Attenborough, Jeff Goldblum, 
      Samuel L. Jackson
     Richard Attenborough makes living dinosaurs from their DNA and
makes a theme park, Jurassic Park, of them on an island of Costa Rica.
He invites scientists Sam Neill, Laura Dern, and Jeff Goldblum to comes
see Jurassic Park.  While the scientists are on the tour some
carnivorous dinosaurs get loose and threaten the whole group.
     JURASSIC PARK is one of the projected summer blockbusters and has
been incredibly hyped up.  This film is not as good as it was supposed
to be.  However, the film is still worth going to see.  Definitely see
this film on the big screen because of the big budget special effects
that will definitely loose their impact on a television screen.  On a
scale of zero to five, I give JURASSIC PARK a four.  JURASSIC PARK is
rated PG-13 for violence and explicit language.
     JURASSIC PARK is loosely based on the novel by Michael Crichton,
who also co-wrote the film.  The film doesn't follow the novel very
faithfully and those that have read the novel may be disappointed with
the film.  The special effects for this film are great, especially the
dinosaurs.  They appear so life-like.
     The film is well written and moves along smoothly.  Some parts are
quite predictable, but what can you expect.  The film does have some
surprises too.  The characters are well done and are written so that
the viewer can't help from hoping that they survive (or bite it
depending on your frame of mind).
     The acting in JURASSIC PARK is great.  Sam Neill (MEMOIRS OF AN
INVISIBLE MAN, DEAD CALM) does a great job as one of the paleontologists
and Laura Dern (WILD AT HEART, RAMBLING ROSE) is excellent as the other
paleontologist.  Richard Attenborough (director of CHAPLIN and GANDHI) is
one of my favorite actors in this film.  His performance is perfect.
Jeff Goldblum (THE FLY, INTO THE NIGHT) does a reasonably good job.  His
acting is not the best (but is much better than some of his old films
-- TRANSYLVANIA 6-5000 comes to mind).  Samuel L. Jackson (NATIONAL
LAMPOON'S LOADED WEAPON 1, PATRIOT GAMES) is my other favorite actor in
this film.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     This weekend I saw JURASSIC PARK.  I would give the dinos a ****
rating as I never thought they were models or simulations and I will
never forgot the awe inspiring sounds they made.  As for the actors,
director and especially the script, I would give them a * rating.
Overall I give the movie a *** rating and wish the dinosaurs would have
eaten all of the people except for say a narrator in the first 5
minutes of the show.
     On the other hand, if they had created people I cared about, well
then I would have preferred them to live and interacted with the dinos.
Since I did not care if the people lived or died, the movie never
scared me unlike Aliens (****) which scared the daylights out of me.
     Now, what really bothered me in JURASSIC PARK were the
stereotypes.  We learned that complex systems are created by single
programmers who are obese, live on candy bars, can single handed write
2 million lines of code, are exploited by evil managers, and are ready
to kill everyone to make their fortune.  Doesn't sound like any of my
friends.
     Like all good Hollywood produced movies with business people in
them we again learn that they are out to make a PROFIT (boo, hiss ...).
Making a profit we are reminded means that you must put your workers in
physical jeopardy, underpay them, and most of all rape the ecohsystem.
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
Albert Sze-Wei Wang
     The film adaptation of Michael Crichton's best selling novel
JURASSIC PARK opened on June 11, 1993, to theaters around the United
States.  The film runs for a total of two hours and six minutes, but as
the story actually runs one can hardly notice the passing of that
time.  The computer affects, which were rendered on Silicon Graphics
Indigo machines by the folks at ILM, the full motion dinosaur affects
by Stan Winston, full motion dinosaur affects by Dennis Muren, and
special dinosaur effects by Michael Lantieri are a tribute to the
technology in movie making which have made possible the resurrection of
a form of life which has been extinct on this planet for over 65
million years.
     Based on sheer entertainment value, JURASSIC PARK does a
tremendous job by keeping the viewer expectant and on the edge of his
or her seat.  Even a person who has read the book will be kept tense
waiting for what will happen next.  Surprises abound in the film story,
and perhaps the most powerful and frightening element is the dinosaurs
themselves, a force of nature that was destroyed in a mass extinction
of life, only to be resurrected by man.
     But despite the phenomenal job the film does visually, it falls
seriously short in development of the characters and overall story.
Perhaps the first serious problem noted was the under-development of
all the main characters with possibly the exception of Ian Malcolm, the
mathematician, and John Hammond.  Alan Grant, Ellie Sattler, Tim,
Alexis, and Gennaro were superficial in the film story, even possibly
knowing too much.  In Michael Crichton's novel, Alan Grant didn't
realize that the Tyrannosaurus Rex's vision relied purely on movement
until he actually stopped moving and realized the large carnivore
seemed to not realize he was there.  For Alan Grant, Jurassic Park was
a wondrous place that showed him whether or not all the hypothesizing
by paleontologists were right or not in determining the characteristics
of individual species and their behavior.  Things like the warm
bloodedness of dinosaurs had long been a subject of debate in the
paleontological communities.  Also, in the novel, Dr. Grant loved kids,
since he and kids had one thing in common: they both loved dinosaurs,
and their popularity kept funding for paleontological projects going.
     Ellie Sattler was a very strong willed and determined
paleo-botanist in Crichton's novel.  She was above all pragmatic, and
very sharp, overlooking nothing when presented with riddles.  In the
novel, the ill dinosaur they found was a Stegosaurus, one that had been
afflicted with a continual ailment in a timed cycle.  By examining the
Stegosaurus's diet, Ellie tried to solve the mystery of the ailment and
determined it wasn't in the food after a thorough examination of the
animal's feces.  However, she and the vet noticed small piles of rocks
that seemed to be deposited by the Stegosaurus and that was when it
dawned on her that the Stegosaurus might use the rocks for digestion,
depositing the stones in the dinosaur's crop to help crush food, and
then spitting them out when the stones are worn down.  She investigated
the place where the Stegosaurus got its rocks from and found that it
was a plant growing on the rocks that was making the Stegosaurus sick
when it went to get a new supply of rocks for digestion.  Ellie and Dr.
Grant are present early on in seeing the adult Velociraptors and
realize the hunting, intelligent, and destructive potential of the
animals when the raptors tried to attack the two of them through the
electrified fence holding chamber.
     Gennaro was a solid clear thinking business man in Crichton's
novel, not the wimpy thin superficial person portrayed on the screen.
Gennaro was a solid pragmatist and certainly not the coward he was made
out to be, since in the book, he risked his own life to help when the
Velociraptors were running around from the power outage.  In the film,
Gennaro's character was merged together with the character of Ed Regis,
the Jurassic Park PR man.
     Nedry's character was developed in the image of a professional
programmer in the novel.  In the film he was molded to fit a standard
stereotype for fat lazy programmer slobs.  Though he does betray
Jurassic Park, the knowledge of his betrayal isn't clear in the novel
until we see him with the can.  The exchange of the can and the coolant
was handled in the novel in an airport, quietly, and without anyone
knowing who was who.
     Tim and Alexis were the two Hammond grandchildren in the novel,
but their roles were switched in the film from Tim being the older one,
to him being the younger.  In the novel, Tim's knack for computers is
established, however, in the tense scenes with the multiple raptors
running around, he and his sister are kept moving, running around,
trying to lose the raptors as they tried to get the computer working
again through direction via walkie-talkie by Dr. Wu, a character which
was completely removed from the thrust of the film story.  Tim
gradually figures it out, but it was a difficult panicked process,
trying to figure out how the setup program worked.
     Robert Muldoon, the game warden was also under-utilized in the
film story.  His expertise with animals and their behavior seemed
portrayed little in the film, reduced to what amounted to the leader of
a security force.
     Ian Malcom was portrayed very well in the film story. In fact he
was turned from a rather unlikable rambling character in the novel to
a witty character in the film story which was quite refreshing.  In
between his discussions of chaos theory, he examines the role man has
in resurrecting a powerful life form, a force of nature, and asks
whether just because you have the technology to do it, whether it
should be done, and he does it with a witty and dark sense of humor.
     John Hammond was portrayed sympathetically in the film and I like
that a great deal better than the unfortunate and rather contrived end
he seemed to meet in the novel, getting eaten by Compys.  In the film
Hammond was as human as everyone else and had redeeming values.  He was
a person who wanted to do something real, to show the world something
wonderful in the film and not a money-grubbing businessman with no
sense of reality.
     1) When Dr. Grant asks what kind of dinosaur it was he was holding
that had just hatched, he doesn't follow up Dr. Wu's answer of
Velociraptor with "Why are you breeding Velociraptors??"  In the novel
what dinosaurs they got were determined by what hatched and the
Velociraptors were one of them.  Dr. Grant knew how powerful the
raptors were and how deadly they are in their pack hunting behavior.
It was a natural question that went unasked in the film.  Dino DNA was
extracted from the stomachs of the mosquitos, but because the DNA there
would be incomplete, DNA sequences from similar animals, like
amphibians, were used to fill the void.  So in many ways, the animals
in Jurassic Park, aren't clones at all, but a new species of animals
created by man, without understanding what plugging of DNA from another
"similar" life form to fill missing strands can really do.
     2) How do the Park administrators make sure no dinosaurs escape
Jurassic Park?  This question was answered immediately in the novel,
but left out completely in the film.  In the novel, an electronic
computerized counting system was used that looked for an expected
number of animals.  Since the animals are all supposedly female, they
can't breed so therefore if the counting system finds the number of
animals simultaneously in various points across the park that it
expects, then no animals have escaped.  It was this flaw in the
counting system (a programming shortcut to look for expected number and
not for how many there actually are since it's easier looking for a
fixed number of animals) that resulted in the problem of breeding going
on undetected.
     3) Ellie and the Triceratops ... so what happened?  They introduced
a loaded gun in the film, Ellie trying to find what was wrong with the
Triceratops and just dropped it.  We never found out if she found out
what was making it sick.  It was something that was started and just
dropped.
     4) Rushed development of characters.  For two hours, I felt the
film needed another thirty minutes to properly develop everyone.  Most
of all, I found it almost unbelievable that Alexis figured out how to
use the computer's setup program that fast.  That entire scene seemed
artificially rushed.
     Summary:  Film character development was weak with exception of
Ian Malcolm and possibly the new and improved John Hammond.  Alan Grant
and Ellie Sattler had a great deal of potential for a lot more, but
failed to come through.  One can only wonder if important footage was
cut out of the original rated R version of the film, or if the
Hurricane had indeed cut filming short because of the extensive
equipment loss.  Story development was incomplete in a number of
places, leaving questions unanswered.  Sam Neill's character wasn't as
flamboyant as I had expected, and Laura Dern was 90% of the way I had
pictured Ellie the paleo-botanist, except that her character was so
under-developed in the film it left me disappointed.
     The deadly nature of the Velociraptors wasn't really made clear
early on at all.  They were portrayed simply as vicious beasts and not
as the cunning, intelligent, and organized creatures that they were in
the novel.  It wasn't just their viciousness that made them dangerous
in the novel, it was their viciousness accompanied by their
intelligence and their deadly speed.  They were pack hunters that
attacked large prey in groups, slashing their victims open viciously
and rapidly.  And worst of all, they had the capacity to learn.
     JURASSIC PARK succeeds however in one key aspect: providing
entertainment.  And though I would have to agree that JURASSIC PARK was
a missed opportunity for a great film, it is by far one of the better
films of all times.  It portrays the affects of playing with a powerful
force of nature, and how serious the consequences can actually be when
playing with that force without fully understanding it.

Author
Chad Polenz
**1/2 (out of 4 = OK)
1993, PG-13, 127 minutes [2 hours, 7 minutes]
[science fiction/thriller]
starring: Sam Neill (Dr. Alan Grant), Laura Dern (Dr. Ellie Sattler), Jeff
Goldblum (Dr. Ian Malcolm), Richard Attenborough (Dr. John Hammond), produced
by Kathleen Kennedy, Gerald R. Molen, written by David Koepp, Michael
Crichton, Malia Scotch Marmo, directed by Steven Spielberg, based on the
novel by Michael Crichton.
Modern storytellers, especially those in Hollywood, are fascinated with
dinosaurs. They have always wanted to tell a plausible story where modern man
somehow co-exists and/or comes into contact with dinosaurs, and "Jurassic
Park" is a film of grand designs that fulfils that wish. The film is
extremely impressive visually, but the story and the way it is told is not.
We meet Dr. Alan Grant (Neill) and Dr. Ellie Sattler (Dern), two
paleontologists whose dig in the Badlands of Montana is interrupted when a
Scottish scientist named Dr. John Hammond (Attenborough) tells them their
expertise is needed for his new theme park in South America. Hammond
describes his "Jurassic Park" in a vague but exciting manner and convinces
them to come with him.
At the same time, an overly complicated sub-plot of espionage begins to
develop. Dennis Nedry (a funny Wayne Knight), a computer programmer at
Hammond's park plans to sabotage it through a complex process of tricks that
only could happen in such a Hollywood movie. 
When the doctors arrive we finally learn what Hammond's park is about as we
get our first glimpse of a realistic, life-size dinosaur. The dinosaurs were
cloned from blood from mosquitoes that had been petrified and preserved for
millions of years in amber. The way this explanation is given is surprisingly
believable because it is kept relatively simple. 
The first half makes for an interesting sci-fi story, as we learn the
dinosaurs are genetically bred to be female, and we see a few up close in
fine detail. Then a matter of scientific and philosophical theory comes into
play as Grant and Sattler, along with mathematician Dr. Ian Malcolm
(Goldblum), start to question the ethics of the park, saying nature selected
dinosaurs to become extinct and Hammond is tampering with uncontrollable
forces. Since we are dealing with fantastic beasts in a major Hollywood
picture, it is clear something big is going to happen from all the scientific
jargon. 
The second half is even more impressive visually, but the story and overall
genre seem to turn on a dime into a dressed up (but thrilling) horror flick.
Nedry's scheme and a tropical storm cause for the park to go into a state of
chaos. Grant and Malcolm, along with a lawyer and Hammond's two young
grandchildren, find themselves on the run from a Tyrannosaurus Rex! This
encounter is fantastic, but goes overboard quickly. We get scenes involving
the dodging of a falling truck, climbing a 50-foot tree and climbing back
down to dodge the same truck, only to have the characters become trapped in
the truck again!
The film's attempt at thrilling us wouldn't have been half as blatant if the
two children stuck with Dr. Grant hadn't been such annoying characters. These
kids overact at every given opportunity and seem more like living cartoons
than any kind of plausible characters. The fact the boy's name is Timmy says
it all. 
The final act involves lots of running from dinosaurs and trying to fix a
huge computer system crash. But the film keeps snowballing and becomes
tiresome. Some individual scenes are even more corny than some slasher
flicks, and if it had been done in the spirit of satire it would have been
forgivable.
To say "Jurassic Park" is a bit over-the-top would be pointless - that's
premise of the film. Over-the-top films work if they are done in a sense of
innocent adventure, not as something to be taken as seriously as this film
would like to be. 
Please visit Chad'z Movie Page @ http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz

Author
James Berardinelli
Starring:  Sam Neill, Jeff Goldblum, Richard Attenborough, Laura Dern, 
           Joseph Mazzello, Ariana Richards
Director:  Stephen Spielberg
Producers:  Kathleen Kennedy and Gerald R. Molen
Screenplay:  Michael Crichton and David Koepp based on the book by 
             Michael Crichton
Music:  John Williams
Released by Universal Pictures
     On a small island off the coast of Costa Rica exists a most
unusual animal preserve by the name of Jurassic Park.  Operated by
dinosaur lover John Hammond (Richard Attenborough), Jurassic Park is
the first of its kind.  Its population of creatures includes
brachiosaurs, dilophosaurs, tricerotops, velociraptors, and a
Tyrannosaurus Rex, each of which has been cloned using the latest
technology that takes DNA from dinosaur-biting prehistoric insects
preserved in amber, and uses that DNA for the re- creation.  When the
consortium funding Jurassic Park become concerned that all is not as it
should be, Hammond is forced to call in three experts:  paleontologist
Dr. Alan Grant (Sam Neill), his partner, paleo-botanist Dr.  Ellie
Sattler (Laura Dern), and the brilliant-but-cynical mathematician Dr.
Ian Malcolm (Jeff Goldblum).  When the trio arrives at Jurassic Park,
they are astonished by what it represents.  It doesn't take long,
however, for astonishment to turn to horror.
     First of all, for anyone who's wondering, given the current state
of technology, the situation postulated in JURASSIC PARK cannot
happen.  Not only do the necessary cloning techniques not exist, but
the likelihood of retrieving dinosaur DNA from an amber-encased
prehistoric mosquito is extremely small.  While insect specimens have
been unearthed, for there to be dinosaur DNA, circumstances demand that
the mosquito had bitten a dinosaur shortly before its fatal
imprisonment, and the chance of that is slim, at best.
     Nevertheless, the enjoyment of any movie is hardly predicated by a
factual premise.  The apparent realism of some of Crichton's
pseudo-science imbues JURASSIC PARK with a grounding that is acceptable
in our high-tech world.  After all, to weave a dinosaur fable in this
day and age, science--not fantasy--must be the driving force.  The
science may not be real, but it must sound good enough to allow a
suspension of disbelief.  In that, this film (and the book that spawned
it) succeeds.
     Of course, the special effects help immensely.  They are so good,
in fact, and the dinosaurs look so real, that I half expected to see
"dinosaur trainer" during the closing credits.  Instead, however, honor
should be heaped upon the creators of JURASSIC PARK's primary screen
presences (all apologies to the actors).  Stan Winston, definitely not
a stranger to this sort of film (his recent credits include ALIENS and
TERMINATOR 2), is credited with the live-action creatures.  Dennis
Muren gets his due for the full motion monsters.  Phil Tippett is the
"dinosaur supervisor", and Michael Lantieri presides over the creature
effects.  All-in-all, the wizards at ILM have done an outstanding job,
giving us by far the most impressive and believable monster movie of
all time.  Nothing compares.
     Would that the story is the equal of its execution.  To begin
with, Crichton's book, while filled with fascinating ideas and
entertaining moments, hardly holds together as a top-of-the-line
adventure story.  The ending is especially problematic, resulting in a
forty-page denouement that drags slowly to an anticlimactic
conclusion.  As a result, a script based closely on the book is bound
to suffer from some of the same problems.  Despite numerous small
changes and omissions, the movie JURASSIC PARK is very much faithful to
its printed inspiration.  Perhaps Michael Crichton's involvement in the
screenplay has something to do with this.
     The biggest weakness of the novel is characterization, and the
same flaw is fully evident in the screen adaptation.  There are a few
exceptions.  The scenes between Alan and Ellie at the beginning are
well-done, with the affection between them evident from the start (a
change from the book, where the two were never a couple).  This is as
much a tribute to the acting of Sam Neill and Laura Dern as to the
writing.  Also noteworthy is a scene where Ellie confronts Hammond,
who's eating a dish of ice cream in the midst of the crisis.  Here, we
get a sense of what's going on inside the old man's head.  In the book,
he's a mixed-up fanatic, but in the film, he's made into a sympathetic,
albeit eccentric, figure.
     Interestingly, some transposition has gone on between Hammond's
two grandchildren.  Tim (Joseph Mazzello) is still the dinosaur-lover,
but the screen's version of the boy is younger than his sister Alexis
(Ariana Richards).  The flip-flop in age creates a difference in their
relationship and they come across as closer and less-adversarial on
screen.  Also, here it's Alexis, not Tim, who's the computer whiz.
     The plot is little more than a cleverly jumbled-together batch of
formulas.  As I mentioned before, JURASSIC PARK is, reduced to its most
basic level, a monster movie.  Thrown in for good measure is the human
interest story--the growing relationship between self-confessed
child-hater Grant and his two youthful charges--but this part of the
film worked least successfully for me.  Also, there isn't an effective
ending.  Too much is left dangling, demanding that the lion's share of
the resolution be confined to the imagination, but at least the movie
avoids the book's plodding conclusion.
Nevertheless, I doubt that there are many who will go to JURASSIC PARK for 
     its characters or story.  Rightly so, crowds will flock to the
theaters screening this movie so they can ooh and aah, jump in their
seats, and root for the overmatched humans against the big, bad
dinosaurs.  When it comes to adventure, JURASSIC PARK is a
roller-coaster ride.  With thrills and action in the tradition of, but
not up to the level of, ALIENS and RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK (another
Spielberg picture), this is an exciting and energetic film with a
number of shocks but few letdowns.  Even those familiar with the
written work can't help being drawn in to the pulse- pounding
exhilaration of the chase as the Tyrannosaurus menaces two powerless
electric cars and the trapped humans inside.
     In the end, JURASSIC PARK succeeds because it's good
entertainment--a fun night at the movies.  Unlike something of the ilk
of CLIFFHANGER, which also boasts a lot of action, there's some
intelligence behind this picture.  JURASSIC PARK isn't great art, nor
is it classic cinema, but at least we don't feel like the producers and
director are more interested in getting as much firepower and death
on-screen as they can without giving a thought as to whether anyone in
the audience has a brain.
     Not having seen all of the summer's offerings (THE LAST ACTION
HERO is still a week away), I can't say how JURASSIC PARK will rate
overall, but I will admit that, in my opinion, this is the first
big-budget film in a long time to live up to its pre-release
reputation.  Sure, the movie isn't perfect, but it delivers--perhaps
more than delivers--what the average viewer will expect from it.
Summer has long been known as the season for action/adventure films,
and JURASSIC PARK falls firmly into that category.
     Because of the nature and scope of this movie, I would encourage
anyone with more than a passing interest to catch JURASSIC PARK in a
movie theater.  It will lose a lot on the smaller TV screen.  Without
the grandeur of a stereophonic sound system and sizeable picture, much
of this film's impact will dwindle away.  The dinosaurs will still look
real, but there will undoubtedly be some who, upon viewing JURASSIC
PARK on video, will wonder what all the fuss is about.
     To this praise, let me add a final word of caution.  While the
violence in this film is not particularly graphic, it is apparent.
People aren't shown getting gored or ripped apart, but the movie makes
it perfectly clear what is happening.  Parents considering taking young
children (under around 10 years of age) to JURASSIC PARK might be
advised to see the film first.  There are certainly a number of scary
and potentially-disturbing moments which, while they add to the spice
for older viewers, may be inappropriate for younger ones.
- James Berardinelli (blake7@cc.bellcore.com)

Author
Michael Har-even
     I wanted to forget my integrity and to write this review without
going to the film. Then, I have decided against seeing the film and
against writing this review. Finally, I saw the film and got 100
million reasons in favor of writing this review. Most of the following
ideas were raised before seeing the film. Those ideas should reflect
trends in the American cinema today. Watching Jurassic PARK reassured
me that I was right.
     Preston Sturges wrote many years ago the golden rules for making a
successful comedy. I would like to list those rules along with my rules
for making a successful commercial film. Naturally, the rules of
Sturges are much better. Here are the rules (my rules are inside
brackets):
     Technology has no correlation to quality. Most of the great
masterpieces of cinema are either silent films or B&W films. The medium
of cinema is realistic by its nature. There should be no essential
difference between a silent film, B&W film or a colored film. The
availability of sound and color opened new ways of expression,
nevertheless, the aesthetic nature of cinema has not been changed since
the beginning.
     One might presume that technology could help to increase the
realistic effect. The truth is that realism cannot be achieved by mere
imitation or by restoration. Realism can be only achieved if the
director and the actors are totally sincere. Spielberg invested 100
million dollars in order to create realistic dinosaurs. The irony is
that his film is totally unrealistic. His film is like the Jurassic
park, amazing at first sight but totally phony. Whether 100 million
dollars or billion dollars are spent virtual reality cannot replace
reality.
     JURASSIC PARK is like a new candy. It seems to be tasty but very
soon you want a sweeter candy. You can enjoy a candy, but how can you
take a candy seriously?

Author
Mark R. Leeper
          Capsule review:  As few films in the past have ever
     managed to do, Steven Spielberg has tapped into the mother
     lode of human dreams and sense of wonder.  Michael Crichton's
     story may be "Westworld" with dinosaurs, but for once the
     biotechnology and the special effects are phenomenal.
     Rating: high +3.
     When Apollo 11 touched down on the moon, I got this funny feeling in my
back and in the back of my neck.  This was where a dream that I'd had became
a reality.  The feeling was one of "Oh boy!  Here we go!" and one of real
anticipation.  In Michael Crichton's novel JURASSIC PARK, a little girl drew
a very detailed picture of the animal that had bitten her.  And the expert
looked at the picture and identified it as a known type of lizard.  But
several of the details were wrong in her picture and that type of lizard was
not known to bite people.  But the case was closed.  And then someone else
looks at the picture and says, "Whose kid drew the dinosaur?"  And even
though it was just a story, I got that same "Oh boy!  Here we go!"  So I was
hoping that sequence would make it to the film.  It didn't.  Instead,
paleontologist Alan Grant (played by Sam Neill), not knowing what the
Jurassic Park concept is all about, suddenly sees an incredibly majestic
sight that is undoubtedly something he had dreamed of his entire life and he
is so overcome with joy and excitement and wonder that he has to look away.
And I was feeling just about the same thing the character was.  "Oh boy!
Here we go!"  Who hasn't dreamed about getting the dinosaurs back?  Now you
can indulge that fantasy for two hours and people are going to flock to do
it.
     Michael Crichton's story itself is really a variant on WESTWORLD.  A
theme park is created with genuine dinosaurs, resurrected thanks to the
magic of DNA cloning from blood found in mosquitoes who sucked on dinosaurs
and then were preserved in amber.  Two paleontologists, a mathematician, and
a lawyer come to certify that the park is real and safe.  Of course it turns
out that the park is very, very real but just a bit lacking in the safe
category.  Neill's Grant epitomizes the stereotype of the soft scientist who
does not get along with machines, even seatbelts.  Laura Dern plays Ellie
Sattler, a second paleontologist who lives and works with Grant, every bit
his equal.  Like Grant she is at first enchanted by the island where live
dinosaurs live, but soon discovers that live dinosaurs have their downside
also.  Jeff Goldblum has many of the best lines as an obnoxious but witty
chaos mathematician.  He uses her acerbic wit to point out just what can go
wrong with the implementation of billionaire entrepreneur John Hammond's
(Richard Attenborough's) plan for the park.  Attenborough finds a human side
to Hammond that is not apparent in the book.  Instead of a vicious maniac
for success, he is more enthusiastic but likable.  Other familiar faces
include Bob Peck (who has done some excellent work in the past, including
the BBC's EDGE OF DARKNESS), Martin Ferrero, and Wayne Knight.
     As enjoyable as Crichton's story is, there is much that cannot be fully
appreciated without actually seeing it.  No description can come close to
the visual impact of this film.  It has been suggested that JURASSIC PARK
ranks with STAR WARS and KING KONG (1933) as a giant leap in representing
images on the screen.  However, there is actually little here that is really
a breakthrough in technology, though virtually every effect that has ever
been used to show dinosaurs on the screen was resurrected and perhaps
refined.  There are hand puppets, dinosaur suits, stop-motion, and computer
graphics, seamlessly and flawlessly integrated.  It took about four decades,
but somebody has finally surpassed Ray Harryhausen at showing dinosaurs on
the screen.  It no longer is easy to tell that this effect is stop-motion
and that one was a computer image, and the dinosaurs look as if they were in
the scene with the people, not rear projections.  Clearly inspired both by
the work of Ray Harryhausen and by a recent revolution in scientific
dinosaur art and paleontology, these dinosaurs show a lot of anatomy,
including the wrinkles, the breathing, the bone structure, and often
tremendous scale.  They do not drag their tails on the ground and even the
heaviest sauropods will rear up on their hind legs to reach the tops of
trees.  The one major aspect of modern dinosaur art technical speculation
that was left behind is choice of color.  The fossil record, of course, is
silent on the color of dinosaurs and some artists these days suggest that it
is likely that dinosaurs were brightly colored, but JURASSIC PARK's
dinosaurs are dully colored.  Still, the film does give a real air of
authenticity.  When the credits say no animals were hurt in the filming, one
wonders, "How did they film that scene without killing that velociraptor?"
     It is a tribute to the special effects that in some of the horror
scenes I was genuinely tense.  A really good film will make me tense, though
I have not been actually frightened by a film since I was nine years old.
(And just as an aside, I treasure those moments when I was young and
actually frightened by film.  I did even then, especially being terrified by
WAR OF THE WORLDS before I was three years old.  I am very thankful that
nobody "protected" ME from them.)  But along with the horror are also the
moments of joy and wonder.  I am pleased that the John Williams score
concentrates on the wonder, not the horror of having the dinosaurs return.
It would be nice if that wonder might push some younger viewers into fields
such as paleontology that pay off in sense of wonder and fulfillment of
curiosity, even if they are not as financially rewarding.  It helps that
JURASSIC PARK is reasonably scientifically accurate.  Most skepticism seems
to center around a belief that dinosaur DNA would  deteriorate in amber over
the tens and hundreds of millions of years.  You could not really clone DNA
that old.  But even that is open to conjecture.  What does seem odd is that
at one point early in the script one of the scientists surprisingly fins a
supposedly extinct leaf from something other than a tree.  I do not think
that's its presence is explained by the premise of cloning.
     The script does include reasonable debates as to whether this
particular scientific wonder is really what the world needs.  Because it is
a disaster story, of course the anti-science side has the upper hand, though
not all the anti-science articles are convincing.  The theme voiced by the
mathematician that life WILL find a way to survive at first is a warning
that the dinosaurs will not be contained, but eventually applies to the
people as well.
     The script was co-authored by Crichton, and David Koepp with more than
a little humor borrowed from such diverse sources as Buster Keaton and Gary
Larson, as well as a few jokes of their own.  In total, this is one of the
most enjoyable adventure films in years.  I rate it a high +3 on the -4 to
+4 scale, but then I am biased toward science fiction.

Author
David Milner
     When JURASSIC PARK was released, history was made.  Forget that it
will probably go on to become the highest grossing film of all time.
Some other motion picture will undoubtedly eventually top it.  Forget
that the special effects far surpass anything that has ever been seen
on the screen before.  There undoubtedly will be improvements made in
the techniques used, and someday, as hard as this may be to imagine
now, the film may actually look a little crude.  What makes JURASSIC
PARK such a unique event is that it fulfills a lifetime of dreams for
millions of people as no other motion picture ever has, or probably
ever will.
     The special effects are indeed spectacular.  Just as STAR WARS set
a new standard back in 1977, so, too, does JURASSIC PARK.  Both the
full-sized dinosaur models created by Stan Winston and the dinosaur
images generated with computers are extremely convincing.  About the
only thing that would have improved the special effects is seeing more
of them.
     The screenplay, however, does leaves something to be desired.
There is almost no plot, and this frankly makes the film a little
dull.  Also, a few of the lines warning about the perils of unbridled
scientific research seem forced, leaving the audience wondering, "where
did this come from," or "what does this have to do with anything."
     When John Hammond, the founder of Jurassic Park, first uses the
line, "we spared no expense," he does so almost with the pride of a new
father.  However, as he repeats it throughout the film, the gradual
change in his outlook from boundless optimism to hopeless despair
becomes apparent.  This is one of the more inspired ideas incorporated
into the screenplay.
     Despite its suspenseful atmosphere, JURASSIC PARK does have a few
very funny moments in it.  The tension of the sequence featuring the
tyrannosaur chasing after a jeep is broken when the dinosaur is seen in
one of the jeep's rear-view mirrors with "objects in the mirror are
closer than they appear" printed on it, and there are some great
one-liners delivered by Ian Malcolm, the chaos theorist.
     The dinosaurs in the film are portrayed much more authentically
than those in any other motion picture.  Dr.  John Horner, a highly
regarded paleontologist, served as an advisor on the film, and a great
deal of time was spent studying the behavior of living animals closely
related to dinosaurs such as frogs and lizards.  However, there were
still a few liberties taken.  Real dilophosaurs, for example, were in
fact much larger than those seen in the film, and they did not spit, or
have frills around their necks.  Also, even though velociraptors were
among the most intelligent of the dinosaurs, most paleontologists agree
that they were only about as bright as chickens.  This makes it
extremely unlikely that they would have been able to learn to open
doors.
     It is fitting that there is a reference to Dr.  Robert Bakker made
in the film.  He, like Dr.  Horner, has contributed a great deal to the
field of paleontology in the past few years, and his book, THE DINOSAUR
HERESIES, is a must for anyone interested in dinosaurs.
     As director Steven Spielberg has been quoted as saying, JURASSIC
PARK is not a film for young children.  It simply is much too violent.
Given this, it is difficult to understand why there were elements that
could appeal only to them, such as the transformation of Dr.  Grant
from someone who dislikes children to someone who accepts them,
included in the film.
     The acting is generally good, but not outstanding.  Sir [now Lord]
Richard Attenborough does give an outstanding performance as John
Hammond, but Sam Neill, who plays Dr. Alan Grant, the paleontologist
brought in to help allay the fears of the investors in Jurassic Park,
and Laura Dern, who plays Dr. Ellie Sattler, the paleobiologist, both
seem a little uneasy in their roles at times.  Jeff Goldblum, too,
gives a slightly inconsistent performance as Ian Malcolm.
     Something that is left unanswered in the film is why a chaos
theorist, who would know virtually nothing about dinosaurs, would be
asked to give his approval to Jurassic Park.  The real answer, of
course, is that chaos theory just happened to be a hot topic when
JURASSIC PARK was being written, but some explanation for this should
have been given in the film.
     John Williams' score is very good, but it is not one of his best.
The music heard during the film's more dramatic moments is very
affecting, but both the slow Jurassic Park theme and the fanfare are a
little too simplistic.
     The sound effects, for the most part, also are good.  However, a
few of the roars produced by the tyrannosaur sound a little too much
like a car horn, and not enough like a noise a living animal would
make.
     The new DTS, or Digital Theatre Sound, system tried out for the
first time with JURASSIC PARK is very impressive.  The increased
clarity and dynamic range allowed for by storing the soundtrack not on
the film itself, but instead on a separate compact disc, really do add
something to the experience of watching a film.
     There is no question that a sequel will be produced.  The loose
ends left in the film show that this was the intention from the start.
Audiences undoubtedly will enjoy seeing more of the magnificent special
effects that made JURASSIC PARK so successful, but it would be nice if
the sequel turned out to be a little better film overall.
Director........................................Steven Spielberg
Music...........................................John Williams
Sam Neill.......................................Dr. Alan Grant
Laura Dern......................................Dr. Ellie Sattler
Sir Richard Attenborough........................John Hammond
Jeff Goldblum...................................Ian Malcolm
Ariana Richards.................................Alexis
Joseph Mazzello.................................Tim
Wayne Knight....................................Dennis Nedry
Bob Peck........................................Robert Muldoon
David Milner  Columbia University  
inet:   dave@blackbox.cc.columbia.edu 

Author
Evelyn C. Leeper
     The current hit movie JURASSIC PARK stars several holdovers from
65 million years ago.  It also shows errors in network security that
seem to be as old.
     For those of you who have just returned from Neptune, JURASSIC
PARK is about a dinosaur theme park that displays live dinosaurs
created after scientists cracked extinct dinosaur DNA code recovered
from petrified mosquitos.  The film has terrific live action dinosaur
replicas and some heart stopping scenes.  It also dramatizes awful
network management and security.  Unfortunately, the policies are as
realistic as the dinosaurs.
     Consider a network security risk analysis for Jurassic Park.  The
entire complex depends on computer controlled electric fences and gates
to keep a range of prehistoric critters from eating the tourists and
staff.  So at a simple level, if the network fails, people turn into
dinosaur food.
     Jurassic Park's security network is controlled by an ultramodern
UNIX system, but its management structures date from the Stone Age.
There is only one person who maintains the programs which control the
security network.  This breaks Kabay's Law of Redundancy, which states,
"No knowledge shall be the property of only one member of the team."
After all, if that solitary guru were to leave, go on vacation, or get
eaten by a dinosaur, you'd be left without a safety net.
     Jurassic Park's security system is controlled by computer programs
consisting of two million lines of proprietary code.  These critical
programs are not properly documented.  An undocumented system is by
definition a time bomb.  In the movie, this bomb is triggered by a
vindictive programmer who is angry because he feels overworked and
underpaid.
     One of the key principles of security is that people are the most
important component of any security system.  Disgruntled and dishonest
employees cause far more damage to networks and computer systems than
hackers.  The authoritarian owner of the Park dismisses the programmer's
arguments and complaints as if owning a bunch of dinosaurs gives him
the privilege of treating his employees rudely.  He pays no attention to
explicit indications of discontent, including aggressive language,
resentful retorts, and sullen expressions.  If the owner had taken the
time to listen to his employee's grievances and take steps to address
them, he could have prevented several dinosaur meals.
     Bad housekeeping is another sign of trouble.  The console where
the disgruntled programmer works looks like a garbage dump; it's
covered in coffee cup fungus gardens, historically significant
chocolate bar wrappers, and a treasure trove of recyclable soft drink
cans.  You'd think that a reasonable manager would be alarmed simply by
the number of empty calories per hour being consumed by this critically
important programmer.  The poor fellow is so overweight that his life
expectancy would be short even if he didn't become dinosaur fodder.
     Ironically, the owner repeats, "No expense spared" at several
points during the movie.  It doesn't seem to occur to him that with
hundreds of millions of dollars spent on hardware and software not to
mention the buildings and grounds and an entire private island, modest
raises for the staff would be trivial in terms of operating expenses
but significant for morale.
     In the movie, the network programmer is bribed by competitors to
steal dinosaur embryos.  He does so by setting off a logic bomb that
disrupts network operations completely.  The network outage causes
surveillance and containment systems to fail, stranding visitors in,
well, uncomfortable situations.  Even though the plot is not exactly
brilliant, I'd like to leave at least something to surprise those who
haven't seen the movie yet.
     When the systems fail, for some reason all the electric locks in
the park's laboratory are instantly switched to the open position.  Why
aren't they automatically locked instead? Normally, when a security
controller fails, the default should be to keep security high, not
eliminate it completely.  Manual overrides such as crash bars (the
horizontal bars that open latches on emergency exits) can provide
emergency egress without compromising security.
     As all of this is happening, a tropical storm is bearing down on
the island.  The contingency plan appears to consist of sending almost
everyone away to the mainland, leaving a pitifully inadequate skeleton
crew.  The film suggests that the skeleton crew is not in physical
danger from the storm, so why send essential personnel away?
Contingency plans are supposed to include redundancy at every level.
Reducing the staff when more are needed is incomprehensible.
     At one point, the systems are rebooted by turning the power off to
the entire island on which the park is located.  This is equivalent to
turning the power off in your city because you had an application
failure on your PC.  Talk about overkill: why couldn't they just power
off the computers themselves?
     Where were the DPMRP (Dinosaur Prevention, Mitigation and Recovery
Planning) consultants when the park was being designed? Surely
everybody should know by now that the only way to be ready for
dinosaurs, uh, disasters, is to think, plan, rehearse, refine and
update.  Didn't anyone think about what would happen if the critters
got loose? Where are the failsafe systems? The uninterruptible power
supplies? The backup power generators? Sounds like Stupidosaurians were
in charge.
     We may be far from cloning dinosaurs, but we are uncomfortably
close to managing security with all the grace of a Brontosaurus trying
to type.
The above text is Copyright (c) 1993 by Network World.  All rights reserved.
Permission is granted by the copyright holder and the author to distribute
this file electronically or otherwise as long as the entire file is printed
without modification.

Author
David N. Butterworth
     On the strength of the McDonald's tie-in alone, kids this summer
will be turning off their TV sets and flocking to JURASSIC PARK, the
latest blockbuster from Steven Spielberg, the man who popularized
man-eating sharks, touch-toning extra-terrestrials and whip-toting
archeologists.
     The problem with the film, plain and simple, is that it focuses
all of its energies on the dinosaurs themselves.  Not one but four
different effects specialists--live action dinosaurs, full motion
dinosaurs, dinosaur supervisor, and special dinosaur effects--are
credited.  While there is no denying their work is truly eye-popping,
everything else takes second billing, resulting in a film with a
surprisingly flat exposition (the first third), a roller-coaster ride
of special effects (its remaining two thirds), and no ending (it just
stops).
     Take that laborious opening.  Spielberg of all people knows how to
set up a movie.  Just look at the first few minutes of RAIDERS OF THE
LOST ARK to experience tension, atmosphere, and pacing.  By contrast,
JURASSIC PARK's setup is long and uninvolving.
     We get to meet our two heroes, boyfriend and girlfriend
paleontologists Grant and Ellie (played by Sam Neill and Laura Dern),
who are visited by Is-He-A-Megalomaniac-Or-Is-He-Just-A-Doddering-
Old-Grandfather John Hammond (Richard Attenborough, taking a break from
directing).  Hammond makes them an offer they can't refuse:  Come
endorse my biological preserve off the coast of Costa Rica and I'll
fund your archeological project for the next three years.  He's already
popped open the champagne so you can assume he figures it's a done
deal.  It is.
     Fans of the Michael Crichton bestseller on which the film is based
will be disappointed.  Gone are all the fascinating details about the
park's upkeep, as well as most of the scientific wranglings about the
mysteries of DNA splicing and genetic reconstruction that made the book
such a good read.  Instead, Spielberg fobs the audience off with an
abbreviated explanation as to how these creatures came to be: Take an
amber-preserved mosquito that has fed off the blood of dinosaurs,
extract and analyze the blood, mix it with a little frog DNA to
complete the chain and bingo!  Barney without the songs or the
moralizing.
     Soon enough the park's chief technician (that fat guy Newman on
TV's SEINFELD) goes AWOL--he's stolen some frozen embryos for financial
gain--and a severe storm hits the island.  Time for the dinos to run
amok.  And run amok they do.  This is where the movie eventually takes
off.
     The audience is then subjected to a veritable onslaught of loud,
head-banging scenes of large carnivorous reptiles biting the heads off
humans and other, smaller dinosaurs.  Stan Winston's live action
effects are quite fantastic.  With few exceptions, these dinosaurs look
and act like the real thing (the scene in which a herd of
"veggie-saurs" thunder across the grasslands is a particular
standout).  Grown-ups and young children will probably be scared out of
their wits, but older kiddies will laugh and scream with glee at all
the mayhem.  Although JURASSIC PARK is rated PG-13, its violence
deserves an R.
     Jeff Goldblum (THE FLY) plays a mathematician called Dr. Malcolm.
In his black leather garb and tragically hip glasses he looks more like
a kook out of a Robert Altman movie than a scientist.  He hangs around
to provide the kind of wisecracks needed to offset all that on-screen
carnage.
     Throughout all this, no-one does anything especially clever, or
even heroic.  Grant and Ellie (and two of Hammond's grandchildren) just
run and run.  And you thought it was the dinosaurs who were supposed to
have brains the size of walnuts!  These humans don't think or plot
their escape; all they do is scream and watch in horror as their
colleagues meet grisly, bone-crunching deaths.  This is a *very* noisy
movie.
     For Steven Spielberg, a director from whom we've come to expect
consummate filmmaking, a lot of JURASSIC PARK is surprisingly shoddy.
The film's only achievements are technical, leaving us with a
mind-blowing assault on the senses in which the human beings are
infinitely less interesting than the dinosaurs.


Author
Sarah M. Elkins
*JURASSIC PARK*:  Action-adventure with dinosaurs running amok and
people running away from them, with some food for thought as well.
PLOT/KICK-OFF:  Various experts are called in to assess safety and
other issues of a mysterious theme park located on an island off of
Costa Rica.  They find out the park's theme is *live* dinosaurs ...
then things start to go wrong.
CHARACTERS/ACTING:  All the characters were pretty natural in their
roles, both their interactions with each other and their reactions to
the dinosaur FX.  I had no trouble believing Sam Neill as the
paleontologist, Laura Dern as the paleobotanist, Richard Attenborough
as the island entrepreneur, or Jeff Goldblum as the chaos
theoretician/mathematician.  I thought Neill, Dern and Goldblum did
particularly well when debating the ethical and potentially disastrous
impacts of the project; from other actors, their lines might have
sounded stagey, glib or pedantic.  There were a couple of kids too,
used pretty well for the most part.
CINEMATOGRAPHY/FX:  One of the early shots of a dinosaur was a little
too obviously people against some sort of matte motion effect, but
other than that, the look and FX were seamless, superb, and quite
believable.  Considering the variety of dinos and their different
behaviors the movie depicted, this is quite a feat -- we see a lot more
than those few effects in the previews.  At one point, although this is
not a 3-D movie, I really did have the sensation that a dinosaur was
leaping directly at *me*--quite a visceral impact.  Clearly a movie to
see first on the big screen.
SCORE/SOUND:  Okay.
SKIN/SITUATIONS:  None.
VIOLENCE/GORE/LANGUAGE:  A severed limb here and there, but other than
that, not much gore (nowhere near the level of the Alien movies, for
example).  Actually not much blood at all, but there is quite a bit of
violence nonetheless: you do have dinos chomping on each other and
people.  Stephen Spielberg (the director) has said he won't let his
8-year-old see it for a couple more years.
ANALYSIS:  Scary fun.  I and others in the audience shrieked and
screamed at several points in the movie.  None of the movie directly
contradicted the dinosaur-related info I've picked up from SCIENTIFIC
AMERICAN articles, although it did refer to some points which are still
controversial.  There was one annoyingly silly product placement, and a
shot which was a bit too obviously staged for irony (analogous to the
shot of the Terminator mowing down the crowd in the Tech-Noir bar, only
not as well done), but otherwise it's a great, gripping ride.  I also
appreciated the discussions on cloning, biogenetics, and chaos theory
between the scientists, though I think some of the explanations were
cut short in the interests of pacing.  Good ending, especially because
the room for the sequel is embedded deeply in the movie and not
referred to again.
COMPARISON TO BOOK:  ******* Minor SPOILERS *******
The movie is tighter than Michael Crichton's book.  I think they did
well in combining a few of the characters and paring out extraneous
introductory subplots.  Hammond is less of a mad fanatic in the movie
and more of an enthusiastic idiot.  The kids' ages are reversed; the
girl is less of a whiner (thank goodness) and has more to do.  The boy
is more annoying at the beginning.  They did change some of the final
confrontations between the people and the dinosaurs, and Alan and the
kids are never on a raft, and the ending itself is changed a little,
somewhat for the better, I think.
- Sarah (elkins.wbst139@xerox.com)

Author
Stian M. Landgaard
JURASSIC PARK (Universal Pictures / Amblin Entertainment)
JURASSIC PARK captured the world when it came. For the first time, 
truly realistic dinosaurs had been created and shown on the screen.
Although the dinosaurs in THE LOST WORLD were even more realistic,
the sequel suffers from too much stupidity, but we will come back to
that in another review.
JURASSIC PARK does work. It does the same for dinosaurs that STAR WARS
did for space-fantasy. We begin with a "teaser" that does nothing more 
than establish the fact we already have guessed: there are live 
dinosaurs on the earth now. The question is just how and where. An
eccentric millionaire, John Hammond (Attenborough), has created an
amusement park on an island not far from Costa Rica, and the attractions
there are to die for, as we shall see. He needs a couple of experts to
endorse the park in order to please the authorities so that he can
complete and open the park for the public. Doctors Grant, Sattler and 
Malcolm (Neill, Dern, Goldblum) are taken to the island to spend some 
days there and investigate the possibility for an amusement park where 
the attractions are ... live dinosaurs, recreated from DNA found in 
mosquito fossils. Unfortunately, one of the employees attempts to steal 
dinosaur DNA from the lab and sell them. By doing this, he causes the 
park system to break down and the dinosaurs are able to break out, 
especially the nasty carnivores, Tyrannosaurus Rex and Velociraptor. Now 
there is Man against Nature in an astonishing action adventure that 
causes adrenalin rushes all the way to the end.
One interesting aspect about the movie, is the low age recommended to
watch it. Actually, JURASSIC PARK is a horror movie, but Spielberg
probably did what he could to make it a grown children's movie. I 
haven't read Michael Crichton's novel upon which the movie was based,
but I would expect it to contain more actual science than the movie.
There are certain scientific goofs in JURASSIC PARK, and I wonder if
Crichton was aware of this.
JURASSIC PARK should NOT have been followed by a sequel (no matter if
the novel was there). Spielberg ruined the "awesome dinosaur image"
by attempting to make them twice as heavy and so on. But JURASSIC PARK 
is in its own right a great movie with marvelous special effects (at 
least in 1993), and the screenplay by Crichton and Koepp is quite good. 
There does seem to be some holes in it, however, and you probably
shouldn't attempt to think too much about continuity and understanding
of the entire story. Just relax (which is impossible in the long run)
and 
enjoy JURASSIC PARK as an action/science fiction movie. Perceived that
way, JURASSIC PARK works best. If you are into the science, read the
novel.
Reviewed by Stian M. Landgaard, April 12th, 1998

Author
Louis Butler
     I didn't write a review of JURASSIC PARK when I first saw it for
many reasons, primary amongst them the fact that I was too busy
standing in wide-eyed amazement at the technological wonder of the
whole thing to pay the slightest bit of attention to the story, the
characters, the dialog, or really any part of the movie beyond the
truly amazing special effects.
     However, after sitting through the movie a second time, several
things came to mind, and I thought I would share them with the net.
     First of all, the movie actually moves along fairly slowly once
you know what's going to happen.  The first time through there is a
frenzied feel to the film, but once the element of surprise is gone,
the movie plods along.  This isn't like ALIENS where each viewing
manages to preach you right back on the edge of your chair all over
again, least ways not for me.
     If JURASSIC PARK is viewed as it should be, a special-effects
extravaganza with a thin envelope of story to hold it all together then
it succeeds marvelously.  If, however it is judged on the same merit
scale as other films, it comes up sadly lacking.
     There is a lot of preaching going on.  Spielberg spends an
inordinate amount of time drilling the same basic "don't f--- with
Mother Nature" theme into our heads.  There's no need, the action in
the movie is sufficient warning to all comers.
     The only characters (beside the T-Rex and the 'raptors) with any
real personality seems to be Dr. Slatter (Laura Dern), the rest are
just cardboard stereotypes that never seem to escape their predefined
molds.  Sam Neill is wasted, I think, in a role that almost any
half-talented actor could have pulled off.  Jeff Goldblum is either
too outrageous, or not outrageous enough -- hovering somewhere in a
morass of ineffectuality.
     I think the mistake Spielberg made was the mistake that Lucas
*didn't* make in STAR WARS, he forgot that no matter how great the
effects are, the movie still has to be about *people*.  With STAR WARS,
the last film to shatter the special effects window, the effects are
just there, literally the vehicles that the story just rides along on,
the story is still a people story.
     Spielberg had a choice, he could either concentrate on the
the 'raptors and make them real characters, as they were in the book, or
he could make a wonderful demo film for ILM.  Too bad he chose the later.
     Perhaps he should have looked at some of the classic
horror/monster flics of the past to see what he did wrong.  KING KONG
for instance, or perhaps more appropriate ALIEN.
     ALIEN was in many ways similar to JURASSIC PARK, "big-bad-monster-
on-the-loose" but it succeeded where JURASSIC PARK failed, in making a
movie that was worth seeing several times.  The only reason to see
JURASSIC PARK again is so you can sit back, relax, and really watch the
effects.  They're perfect.  They're wonderful, and they're all that's
there to see.

Author
Phineas Narco
     JURASSIC PARK has finally opened and heretofore has been one of
the most eagerly anticipated and much talked and speculated about film
in quite a while.  Today was opening day and I saw the first showing
having purchased my tickets two weeks ago.  Surely, this opening
weekend will put a lot of money in Universal Picture's coffers.  I
arrived at the theater 2-1/2 hours before the 10:45 AM show, and there
were about 25-30 people already in line.  Amazingly, however, I don't
think the first show sold out as there were a lot of empty seats in the
theater when the movie started.  However, when I came out the line
stretched past the theater parking lot and spilled well into the mobile
home park (private property signs notwithstanding) next door to the
theater.
     PREMIERE magazine said it best when predicting JURASSIC PARK as
the number one hit of the summer (it will be) when it said that the
movie provides what people love to go to movies for in the first
place:  it gives them something they've never seen before, and that
Spielberg and company have a good track record (more or less) for
giving them just that.
     Let's face it, people are flocking to see JURASSIC PARK for
basically one thing ... the dinosaurs.  What child hasn't been at least
mildly fascinated with these ancient creatures and dreamed of what they
were like?  This is perfect thematic territory for Spielberg who revels
and excels in making movies that speak to the wide-eyed little kid in
all of us.  A lot of discussion has centered around whether this movie
is acceptable for children.  Well, I pity parents with very young
children because they will most certainly be very very interested in
seeing the movie, but will probably suffer from nightmares afterwards.
The movie is violent but--and I didn't realize this until later--it
is virtually bloodless.  Any dinosaur savaging of any kind is either
done off-screen, is obscured by something in the foreground, or
gore-less.  The only really gory part is a brief shot of a severed arm;
this movie has *far* less blood in it than Spielberg's 1975 effort
JAWS, which was rated PG, one step down from the newer rating which
this movie received.
     It's still frightening, though--because what one *doesn't* see is
often worse, in the imagination, than what one *does*, and also because
of the extreme realism of the special effects.  A kid can have fun with
a Saturday afternoon G-Rated movie like THE SEVENTH VOYAGE OF SINBAD or
any other Ray Harryhausen movie because the violence is rather cheezy
and doesn't look all that real (at least by today's special effects
standards).  JURASSIC PARK is special in that it is a ground-breaking
special effects film like STAR WARS or TERMINATOR 2 was, the kind
that comes along every few years (with increasing regularity, I might
add).  There are a lot of scenes in this movie where you really cannot
tell if there is an actual "beast" right there, live, or if it was
something added in post-production.  Half the people in the theater
were awed into silence by these special effects while the other half
was reverently  applauding them.  Those that stayed for the credits
applauded the names of the SFX technicians.
     The dinosaurs, the special effects, in fact, every technical
aspect of this movie are the real stars of it.  And yet, it doesn't
seem contrived; the movie flows seamlessly in its adventure through
this prehistoric fantasy world; you don't have the sense of some
special effects technician stepping rudely into the storyline and
saying in effect, "Look what I can do!", and yet have little else to
offer.  This, I think, was an unfortunate aspect that ruined other
otherwise good movies like TOTAL RECALL and most recently,
CLIFFHANGER.
     The dinosaurs are, in a word, fantastic, and had me practically
levitating out of my seat at one moment and staring wide-eyed with my
mouth open the next.  But more on them in a moment.
     The much talked about sound system is indeed, as I heard one
person aptly describe it, a feast for the ears.  As I understand it is
contained in compressed form on a CD-ROM and each of the frames of the
film is encoded with an unseen number which keeps the soundtrack
(music, sound effects, dialogue, etc.) in sync with the picture.    The
ambient sounds of the jungle, the rainfall, the thunderstorm and the
sounds of the dinosaurs themselves, surround you in a way never quite
attained with other systems (apparently George Lucas' THX system was
used to mix the soundtrack or else was used in some other way, as the
logo appears in the closing credits--thanks is also given to George
Lucas).  It is also very well suited to John Williams' soundtrack which
deftly captures both the majesty and suspense of the various scenes.
Especially in the "high-action" sequences, the soundtrack recalls his
work in Spielberg's CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND.  JURASSIC PARK
won't get any Oscars for acting, directing, or best picture, but it
will no doubt sweep the technical awards next year at the Academy
Awards, and will *definitely* get "Best Sound."  (But then again, I
was sure BATMAN RETURNS was going to win "Best Costumes," and it didn't
even get nominated in that category).
     The acting is largely unremarkable and yet as good as any other
Spielberg movie.  I thought the most interesting aspect of this was
Neill's character's dislike of children and Dern's character's
awareness of this, something that is obvious yet remains completely
unspoken throughout the film.
    Now... some words about those dinosaurs...
[Note--the rest of this review gives details on what the dinosaurs
looked like and other plot points.  If you would rather be surprised,
don't read any further]
The Brachiosauri and the Hadrosauri:
     The first really good look at a dinosaur comes a full fifteen to
twenty minutes into the picture (at least it seemed that long) and it
is nothing short of breathtaking.  A titanic Brachiosaurus lumbers a
few feet away from the principal characters, astonishingly graceful for
its huge size as it stands on its hind legs and nibbles on a tall
tree-top.  The characters are just a few feet away from this huge
beast, as I say, something I would be very loath to do in such a
situation as this behemoth could obviously crush a jeep like it was a
styrofoam cup.  The effect is almost perfect.  There are no matte
lines; the "effect" moves perfectly in sync with the changing angle
of the camera which looks up at this towering behemoth.  I was amazed
that you can actually see the action of this creature's muscles and
sinews, under its skin, as it moves across the screen.  If you look
closely, you can see just the slightest jerkiness of animation as it
reaches up for the tree-branches.  The skin looks a little bit too
shimmery ... but all in all, this first glimpse of one of the dinosaurs
blew my socks off.  Perhaps I've been watching videos too long as I
found myself reaching for a remote control to back it up and look at it
again.  A wonderful long shot is seen at the end of this scene of a
couple of Brachiosauri in a lake while duck-billed dinosaurs
(Hadrosauri) drink at the water's edge.  The scene is seen through
the "heat shimmer" one would naturally see while looking across water
on a sunny day, adding yet another splendid dimension of authenticity
to the scene.
     Later in the movie, we see the huge head of a Brachiosaurus as it
discovers Neill's character, and the two kids, in a tall tree.  They
playfully pet it and feed it branches.  Neill's character continually
reassures the little tykes that the Brachiosaurus is a "veggie-saurus"
and therefore harmless to humans.  This was a little unrealistic for
me ... I mean, sure it's a vegetarian, but so are rhinoceri and bull
elephants, and they are hardly "harmless," and I wouldn't want to get
too close to one.  In the case of the Brachiosaurus (which isn't all
that bright, about as smart as a cow--a very, very *big* cow), it
probably wouldn't know your arm wasn't a branch until it spat it,
severed and mangled, from its chomping jaws.  But it seems this scene
was necessary to show at least *some* dinosaurs were friendly.
     Actually only one is shown in the film, and although it seems very
much alive (it breathes, its eyes roll, its "nose" snorts, its legs
twitch) the poor thing is sick as a dog and doesn't really move to
speak of.  This leads to a pretty funny scene involving heaping,
steaming mounds of "dino-dung."
     These are the "gazelles" of the prehistoric world.  This is
another wonderful sight that you only glimpse briefly in the television
trailer.  A stampede of these fast-moving kangaroo-type beasts sweep
across the sun-drenched grassy plains at high speed.  Fantastic
effect.  It occurred to me while watching this that the reason so many
stop-motion effects of yesteryear don't look quite right and have that
"animated" quality to them is that they are actually shot perfectly
still in several different positions and while viewed in sequence they
seem to be moving, but there's one realistic quality of motion in
this type of animation that isn't captured in this method and that
is ... the blur.  "Real" things blur on film when they move quickly and
that is just what has been done here (I assume by computer
enhancement).  The effect is a real jaw-dropper.
     This is a curious and frightening creature (at first it just seems
curious and even harmless), just a little mechanical looking, somewhat
smaller than how I visualized it in the book.  When attacking, (which
consists of spitting brown-green viscous, paralyzing, blinding, "gobs"
onto its prey) a multi-colored fan of skin opens up around its head
like that lizard that runs across the desert on its hind legs, which
the Japanese find hilarious, that you see on "National Geographic" all
the time.
     You'll be looking at some of the T-Rex footage wondering how the
hell they filmed it, and that's the real acid test for a good
effect.  The Rex is devastating, horrifying, awe-inspiring, even
somewhat beautiful.  The ultimate monster--it kind of makes Godzilla
look like Barney and "Jaws" look like a tadpole.  In the scene where
you first see the beast, in its attack on the jeeps, it just about had
me climbing up onto the back of my theater seat.  The sequences with
the T-Rex are technically seamless.  What more can I say?
     Well ... chilling.  The creatures have a cold-as-steel, evil, yet
intelligent look to them.  True predators, and very faithful to how
they are depicted in the book.  I only wish their presence in the
movie, their "character," if you will,  was more fully explored.  There
is one moment during the climax with these creatures (which I won't
give away) that almost made me jump into the aisle behind me.
    The fact that I would have liked to have seen the Raptors more
fully explored, as they were in the book, brings me to an aspect of
JURASSIC PARK that has been much discussed on Internet, and that is
how it compares to the book.
     Basically what you got here is a movie just over two hours long,
as a lot of Spielberg blockbusters are.  The producers, and the studio,
probably didn't want it too much longer than that to ensure maximum
showings in the theater for any given day were possible.  However, when
comparing JURASSIC PARK: THE MOVIE to JURASSIC PARK: THE BOOK, what
you basically got here is a telescoped, condensed, Reader's Digest
version of the book's story.  It occurred to me that to fully cover what
took place in the book (and this is true of almost all book/movie
adaptations) you were probably looking at *at least* a three-hour or
three-and-a-half-hour movie ... maybe even a mini-series.
     Before the movie was made, Michael Chrichton, the author of the
book on which it was based, said that the movie couldn't be faithfully
done for less than $100 million, and he was probably right (I would be
interested to hear what he thought of this movie).  But, there is also
the constraint of time to deal with however, and there is simply not
enough running time in a movie to deal with everything that happened
with the book.  On some levels, the book is better, for example in the
sense of sustained suspense.  I was in a higher and more sustained
state of tension while reading the book than the movie.  The book's
sense of suspense and tension is higher and more drawn out, sustained
longer, while the movie hits you with these fast, hard-hitting,
intense scenes with minimum build-up and are over relatively quickly.
     Here are some of the differences:  (Note, I do not have
the book to refer to at the time of this writing, even
though I have read it, I am doing this from memory)
     Those are really the major differences as I remember them.
     One thing ... if this movie goes the way of BATMAN and its sequel,
it will be on video by Christmas time.  Due to the subject matter of
the film, you really *need* to see it on the biggest screen you can
find and sit close to the screen for maximum effect.
     In summation, JURASSIC PARK is a treat.  Technically it is a real
milestone, a ground-breaking film, and in the age of movies like
CLIFFHANGER, TOTAL RECALL, and BATMAN RETURNS--movies that are really
nice to look at, but otherwise a mess,  where substance takes a
backseat to style--it's nice to find a movie which is not only a feast
for the eyes and ears, but also offers engaging characters, a taut,
suspenseful storyline, and good old-fashioned chills thrills and
spills.  If you think you've seen it all--see this movie for something
you've never seen before and to feel like a kid again.  JURASSIC PARK
is a winner.

Author
Michael Turton
Jurassic Park Directed by Steven Spielberg.  Starring Sam Neill, Jeff
Glodblum, Laura Dern and Richard Attenborough.        Reviewed by Michael A. Turton
(turton@cc.fy.edu.tw)
I swore I would never review this movie, but here I am.... 
_Jurassic Park_ is a film so towering that it has managed to maintain its
emotional power over the years, despite being forced to overcome one of the
most intense commercialization campaigns in film history, as well as the
worst sequel since _Return of the Jedi_.  The tremendous worldwide success of
_Jurassic Park_ represents the pinnacle of Steven Spielberg's achievements as
a director, the film showcasing every one of his strengths and weaknesses.
Based on the best-seller by Michael Crichton, _Jurassic Park_ at first
appears to be part-thriller, part-morality play about the strength of life
and the failed promise of technological magic, or as a sort of updated
_Sorcerer's Apprentice_ of naive humans playing with forces beyond their ken.
It is easy to fall into the trap of seeing the dinosaurs as representing the
primal vigor of Life, as Spielberg invites us to do.  The first time we see
the dinosaurs (a moment which made tears of joy roll down this reviewer's
cheeks the first time he saw it) they are gloriously virginal in a lush
natural setting: not an artifact in sight.  The first dinosaur we are in
intimate contact with is sick, for Pete's sake!  What could be more natural?
Yet, in the end, this movie is not about life or dinosaurs.  Instead, it asks
the question: how can human beings live in the technological nightmare worlds
they have constructed for themselves?  There are many moments of exploration
of attitudes toward technology in the film, as when one character chortles
upon opening the amazing can of shaving foam which is really a secret storage
container for smuggling embryos (a debased version of Jurassic Park's owner's
pride in his creation), or when the leading characters argue about the import
of Jurassic Park.  Many of Ian Malcolm's criticisms of the cloning project
represent critiques of technology and science which can be found in the
writings of sociologists and philosophers of technology. The movie opens with
Grant's grousing about how he can't get along with technology.        We're all
struggling to catch up with the modern world, he observes later, with real
anguish
Or consider. Far more time is spent on the hazards of technology than on
pursuit by dinosaurs.  The threats to the children -- the car falling out of
the tree, the perimeter fence being turned on -- are technological threats.
Spielberg alludes to this at the beginning.  As the movie opens, we hear a
roaring and a crushing.  Expecting a dinosaur, what do we see?        A machine. A
little joke, to be sure, but a revealing one nonetheless.  The wrenching
twist from the roar of the T. Rex to Samuel L. Jackson's "Keystroke. Check."
is a marvelous clue to the nature of the world Spielberg has built. 
Educated, intelligent people are helpless before baffling or failed tech
(What!        No phones?  Help!), as helpless as when faced with a T. Rex. The plot
may be unified and fulfilled when the T. Rex nails the velociraptor as it is
about to disembowel our blue-eyed heroes, but the film's premise is shown in
the brilliant shot during the pursuit when a velociraptor, bathed in the
light of a computer monitor, suddenly appears as a collection of computer
data constructions.  The real meaning is this: the dinosaurs are a technology
too.  The film's attempt to portray them as "Life finding a way" is a shallow
distortion: they are not even real animals but biotechnological amalgamations
of frogs and dinosaurs, grotesqueries born in incubators under hot lights.
Of course, with Spielberg at the helm, the film follows the Hollywood formula
which Spielberg, applying in varying degree to all his movies, has brought to
its ultimate refinement: the healing of a family, the trivialization of
minorities, a lush score, technical and directorial brilliance, first-rate
acting, a redemptive ending, the focus on the obvious meaning and leadership
by the blue-eyed.  In his real-world films such as _Schindler's List_ and
_Saving Private Ryan_, this cookie-cutter perfectionism has led to great
films which are greater failures, but The Formula is well-suited to a fantasy
like _Jurassic Park_.
That said, _Jurassic Park_ remains a brilliant movie with moments of
delicious humor, a fast pace and excellent acting.  The reflection of the T.
Rex in the rearview mirror is a wickedly funny satire.        Laura Dern and the
young actor who plays the granddaughter both deliver especially noteworthy
performances.  The effects are magnificent. The irresistable splendor of the
dinosaurs overcomes even the predictable chase scenes and the predictable
ending. It is a film filled with wonderful shots: the birds viewed from the
window of the chopper at the end, a reminder of how dinosaurs are still with
us; Laura Dern attempting to stare down a velociraptor, every muscle in her
body straining; the moment when we first see the Brachiaosaur feeding, the
chase of the jeep (think they'll have that on the tour?) and of course, the
T. Rex emerging from the enclosure in the midst of a terrible storm, the
ultimate realization of the Frankenstein complex.
If there are any flaws in the film, they lie in two areas.  First, the
dinosaurs themselves do not reflect the current state of paleontonological
thinking.  The public may have accepted Bob Bakker's suspect arguments for
dinosaurs as warm-blooded, but hardly any scientists think the matter is so
cut-and-dried. Second, the "white middle-classness" of the film in which only
blacks, lawyers, fat people and other undesirables die while the blue-eyed
triumph is also highly objectionable (I live in Taiwan, where Hollywood has
successfully inculcated the belief that only blue-eyed people are real
Americans.  As a brown-eyed scion of Italian and Polish immigrants, this
infuriates me.).  There are a few minor flaws (a T. Rex can't knock over a
jeep one-twentieth of its weight?) but none really interfere with the
suspension of disbelief.
Not just a rental from time to time, _Jurassic Park_ is a first-rate keeper, a
classic for the ages.  This reviewer gives it 5 out of 5 and would love to see
it on the big screen again.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
John Hagerman
     Everybody is going to see this movie anyway, and I'm not much of a
movie reviewer, so I'm not sure why I'm bothering to review it.  But
anyway, here goes.  The plot is: Dinosaurs are cloned to make a theme
park, auditors come to check it out, and they decide it's not a very
safe place.  By the way, the movie is not a very safe place for kids;
you can imagine what hungry, carnivorous dinosaurs do to people.
     As you would hope for $100 million, the special effects are
superb.  I came away feeling that I had some idea what it would be like
to stand next to a live dinosaur.  However, today's great special
effects are tomorrow's run-of-the-mill effects.  Since I wasn't
impressed with the other aspects of the movie, I think that JURASSIC
PARK will go down in movie history merely as another pioneering effort
in special effects.
     I've read the book and, as usual, it's better.  (The only case I
can think of where this was not true was BLADE RUNNER, but that's not
even really fair since the movie was only loosely based on the book.)
The problem with JURASSIC PARK is, as usual, that there are lots of
good ideas in the book and too many of them were put into the movie.
For example, if I hadn't read the book, I would have come out of the
movie wondering just what the heck Jeff Goldblum's character was
supposed to be doing, blathering about chaos theory.  But that's okay,
because only lip service is paid to this thread, and then it's quickly
dropped.  If you have read the book, you will know that Michael
Crichton is pretty good about science.  Unfortunately, science takes
time, and time can't be spared in the movie, so don't expect to learn
anything.
     The movie has its gripping moments (how could it not with teeth
like that?), but I think the guy next to me who fell asleep would
agree: If you took away the special effects you would find a mediocre
movie with a predictable script, flat characters, and uninspired
acting.
     I suggest that you wait until this movie comes out again in the
dollar theaters next year after it has won Best Special Effects.  Or
better yet, just read the book; your imagination will do the effects
just as well, and you will find a much better story.

Author
I. I. Pasternak
     This article Uncle Pasternak will be reviewing that summer
blockbuster, JURASSIC PARK.  Since you've all seen it already, I
thought I'd review some of the less well-circulated prints.  Most of
the versions Uncle Pasternak will tell you about today didn't even make
it into this universe.
     I programmed my pal Morris to plot me an eight-dimensional map of
universes not too far from this one where JURASSIC PARK was playing;
since this is rec.arts.movies, I restricted the result space to
universes of discourse where the opus in question was more or less a
movie.  (Sorry, I won't be reporting on JURASSIC PARK: THE MUSICAL
COMEDY this week.)  Then I rubbed out the universes where 13's not a
prime number and crap like that and we settled in for some hard-core
marathon movie-viewing.  Some of the eighteen flicks we saw were
nothing special, but some were really worth while.  Here are a few of
the most delightful:
     The first couple I saw weren't too spectacular, but then I had a
pleasant surprise on the third version.  In that universe, Spielberg
seemed to be more like Roger Corman or someone.  His first big hit was
JAWS, just like here, but from there he moved into more mainstream
horror flicks.
     (A side note: The guy sitting next to me in the theatre told me a
lot of interesting things about CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND and
E.T., but I didn't get to see them.  It seems that if you want to see
E.T. get stoned to death in the end, you should check this place out.
I was sorely tempted, but I was running out of time and I had to
complete my mission for the readers of rec.arts.movies.reviews. I
didn't remember to ask my informant about RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK.)
     JURASSIC PARK as a Spielberg-directed horror flick worked pretty
well.  It was a lot closer to the book in most ways than the version
from our world, and a lot scarier.  One other feature of note: Laura
Dern was a man.  Now I know all you horny types out there will want to
know: What does Laura Dern look like as a man?  She was kind of
Redfordish, but you know, it's funny, but she didn't look much
different.
     The next version I saw was an interesting surprise, if an
unpleasant one.  It was directed by David Lynch.  In this universe, Sam
Neill isn't even in the movie.  The kids are gone too.  It's hard to
describe---the plot is a lot more complicated, and I'm not sure I
really understood everything that was going on.  But I was sufficiently
intrigued to hang around there and do a little research, and I learned
that in that world, Lynch is married to Dern and they've been working
together for years and years.  From what I saw, I can imagine that
their version of BLUE VELVET looks pretty much the same, but it seems
that quite a few people got more than a little upset about some of the
scenes Dern did in ERASERHEAD, when she was underage, and Lynch had
to marry her to get the law off his back.
     The next few versions were unremarkable, and I was beginning to
get bored, so I went a little far afield on the one after.  It was a
lot of work to get into the theatre inconspicuously, but I knew you'd
want to hear about it, so Uncle Pasternak took the plunge and went to
see JURASSIC PARK in a universe where the dominant life-form on Earth
was, you guessed it, evolved from dinosaurs.  I guess the surprising
thing is that the movie wasn't really all that different.  It was
certainly still a thriller, and it reminded this reviewer a lot of
PLANET OF THE APES:  The protagonists are marooned millions of years
in the future, in a world controlled by bizarrely evolved lower
animals.  It still has a happy ending though, by which I mean that the
dinosaurs devour the human actors and escape to the mainland.  The
computer-generated humans were incredibly lifelike.  I tried real hard
to see it on a double bill with SUPER MARIO BROTHERS, but I couldn't
arrange it.  Sorry, guys.
     The ones I looked for but couldn't find:  A LAND OF THE LOST
crossover.  The one with Raquel Welch instead of Laura Dern.
     The ones I found but had to miss: The Disney animated version.
(That one *was* playing on a double bill with SUPER MARIO BROTHERS, but
you have to be thirty years old to get into X-rated theaters there.
Bummer!)  The one in which the dinosaurs escape from a lab in the top
floor of the Nakamoto building and are repelled by Bruce Willis.
DINOSAUR!, a comedy starring Ringo Starr, Barbara Bach, and Shelley
Long.  KING KONG VS. JURASSIC PARK.
     Well thanks, folks!  See you next month at this time, when I
review THE ROAD SCHOLAR, starring Mel Gibson.
     Note to Jimmy L.: Yes, I got you a copy where Sam Neill wears a
merrywidow and wallows in triceratops shit.  The price is as usual.
